Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-14,115
Member or employee of commission; confidential information; disclosure, when; violation; penalty.

No member or employee of the commission shall disclose or discuss any statements, reports, records, testimony, or other information or material deemed confidential by the Nebraska Political Accountability and Disclosure Act unless ordered by a court or except as necessary in the proper performance of such member's or employee's duties under the act. Any member who violates this section shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 115;

Laws 1977, LB 41, § 57;

Laws 2005, LB 242, § 54.